Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.490

Sponsored committee. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Sponsored committee" means a committee, other than an authorized committee, that has one or more sponsors.

[ 2024 c 164 s 249.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.